Washington statutes.
RCW 39.24.060

Purchases from nonprofit agencies for the blind.

(1) All purchases made by a public agency are subject to the requirements established under RCW 19.06.020.

(2) For the purposes of this section, "public agency" means those agencies subject to RCW 19.06.020.

(3) This section is not intended to create an entitlement to an individual or class of individuals.

[ 2016 c 40 s 2.]

NOTES:

Construction—2016 c 40: See note following RCW 39.26.285.